Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Chapter 13. Improvement of Navigability of Streams.

§ 62.1-155.
Cooperation by cities on navigable streams with United States.

The cities in the Commonwealth situated on navigable streams shall have the power to cooperate with the United States of America in the improvement of the navigability of such streams involving the deepening, widening and straightening the channel thereof and making provision for turning basins at terminals and mooring areas thereon.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-117.8; 1958, c. 467; 1968, c. 659.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

20 M. J. Waters and Watercourses, § 3.

§ 62.1-156.
Power of cities to give assurances to United States.

In order to execute the purposes and objectives declared in §

62.1-155

, the cities therein defined shall have the power to give assurances to the United States of America that they will:

Furnish or cause to be furnished free of cost to the United States, when and as required by its duly authorized representatives, lands, easements and rights-of-way and spoil or dredged material disposal areas, unrestricted in disposal elevations, for the shore disposal of material to be initially dredged and for future maintenance of such improvements within and without such cities;

Furnish or cause to be furnished, when and as so required, permits or easements for ingress to and egress from highways to such shore disposal areas, and permits or easements to construct pipeline trestles across oyster and clamming grounds and to lay dredge pipelines across lands adjacent to such shore disposal areas within and without such cities;

Subject to all applicable laws, secure such releases or permits, either or both, as may be required, holding and saving the United States, its contractors and assigns free from any and all claims for damages to public or privately owned oyster and clamming grounds resulting or attributable to the accomplishment of the initial dredging or subsequent maintenance of such improvements, either or both;

Secure such releases or permits, either or both, as may be so required, holding and saving the United States, its contractors and assigns free from any and all claims (a) for damages resulting from any change in the natural course of such rivers, (b) for damages resulting from blasting operations in the removal of rock or changes in ground water levels, and (c) for costs resulting from provision and operation of any bridges or ferries that may be necessary for furnishing connection between the mainland and any islands created by channel cutoffs;

Relocate or cause to be relocated, at no cost to the United States, when necessary, roads, bridges, waterfront structures, sewerage, water supply, storm drainage, electric power, and other utility facilities within and without such cities, except those which the United States has theretofore permitted to be constructed in, under or over such rivers;

Construct, maintain, expand and operate such terminal facilities within such cities which may be required to accommodate prospective foreign and domestic commerce expected to develop from the improvement of the channel of such rivers, the extent of such facilities to be mutually agreed to by the council of such cities and the duly authorized representatives of the United States; and

Contribute funds to the United States necessary to construct, extend and maintain mooring or berthing areas immediately adjacent to river terminals of such cities when necessary because of expansion of such terminal facilities.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-117.9; 1958, c. 467; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-157.
Power of cities to bind themselves to perform or execute assurances.

The cities defined in §

62.1-155

shall have the power to irrevocably bind themselves to do any and all things necessary to perform or execute the assurances authorized to be given pursuant to §

62.1-156

anything in the charters of such cities to the contrary notwithstanding.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-117.10; 1958, c. 467; 1968, c. 659.

§ 62.1-158.
Claims for damages to oyster and clamming grounds.

Claims for damages to oyster and clamming grounds may be asserted in the courts having jurisdiction in the county or city in which such damages occur.

History.

Code 1950, § 62-117.11; 1958, c. 467; 1968, c. 659.